Washington statutes.
RCW 10.93.050

Supervisory control over peace officers.

All persons exercising peace officer powers under this chapter are subject to supervisory control of and limitations imposed by the primary commissioning agency, but the primary commissioning agency may, by agreement with another agency, temporarily delegate supervision over the peace officer to another agency.

[ 1985 c 89 s 5.]